Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Creation and Duties of Administrative Office of Courts

§ 9-21-1.
Administrative Office of Courts established; purpose; “court” defined.

The Administrative Office of Courts is hereby created. The purpose of the Administrative Office of Courts shall be to assist in the efficient administration of the nonjudicial business of the courts of the state and in improving the administration of justice in Mississippi by performing the duties and exercising the powers as provided in this chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term “court” means any tribunal recognized as a part of the judicial branch of government, but not including county boards of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1993).

§ 9-21-3.
Duties of Administrative Office of Courts.

The Administrative Office of Courts shall be specifically charged with the duty of assisting the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Mississippi with his duties as the chief administrative officer of all courts of this state, including without limitation the task of insuring that the business of the courts of the state is attended with proper dispatch, that the dockets of such courts are not permitted to become congested and that trials and appeals of cases, civil and criminal, are not delayed unreasonably.

The office shall also perform the following duties:

To work with the clerks of all youth courts and civil and criminal trial courts in the state to collect, obtain, compile, digest and publish information and statistics concerning the administration of justice in the state.

To serve as an agency to apply for and receive any grants or other assistance and to coordinate and conduct studies and projects to improve the administration of justice by the courts of the state, and it may conduct such studies with or without the assistance of consultants.

To supply such support to the Judicial Advisory Study Committee necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, including without limitation, research and clerical assistance.

To promulgate standards, rules and regulations for computer and/or electronic filing and storage of all court records and court-related records maintained throughout the state in courts and in offices of circuit and chancery clerks.

It shall perform such other duties relating to the improvement of the administration of justice as may be assigned by the Supreme Court of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 547, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 507, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1997).

§ 9-21-5.
Administrative Director.

The Administrative Director shall be appointed by and shall serve at the pleasure of the Supreme Court of Mississippi as the Director of the Administrative Office of Courts. The Administrative Director shall devote full time to the duties of the office to the exclusion of engagement in any other business or profession for profit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 3; Laws, 1996, ch. 492, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1996).

§ 9-21-7.
Director authorized to hire assistants and employees.

The Administrative Director, with the approval of the Supreme Court, is authorized to employ and set the compensation of such assistants and other employees as are necessary to enable him to perform his duties, subject to approval of the State Personnel Board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1993).

§ 9-21-9.
Duties and authority of Director.

The Administrative Director of Courts shall have the following duties and authority with respect to all courts in addition to any other duties and responsibilities as may be properly assigned by the Supreme Court:

To require the filing of reports, the collection and compilation of statistical data and other information on the judicial and financial operation of the courts and on the operation of other offices directly related to and serving the courts;

To determine the state of the dockets and evaluate the practices and procedures of the courts and make recommendations concerning the number of judges and other personnel required for the efficient administration of justice;

To prescribe uniform administrative and business methods, systems, forms and records to be used in the offices of the clerks of courts;

To devise, promulgate and require the use of a uniform youth court case tracking system, including a youth court case filing form for filing with each individual youth court matter, to be utilized by the Administrative Office of Courts and the youth courts in order that the number of youthful offenders, abused, neglected, truant and dependent children, as well as children in need of special care and children in need of supervision, may be tracked with specificity through the youth court and adult justice systems; in support of the uniform case docketing system, the director shall require that all youth courts utilize the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System (MYCIDS);

To develop, promulgate and require the use of a statewide docket numbering system to be utilized by the youth courts, which youth court docket numbers shall standardize and unify the numbering system by which youth court docket numbers are assigned, such that each docket number would, among other things, identify the county and year in which a particular youth court action was commenced;

To develop, promulgate and require the use of uniform youth court orders and forms in all youth courts and youth court proceedings;

To prepare and submit budget recommendations for state appropriations necessary for the maintenance and operation of the judicial system and to authorize expenditures from funds appropriated for these purposes as permitted or authorized by law;

To develop and implement personnel policies for nonjudicial personnel employed by the courts;

To investigate, make recommendations concerning and assist in the securing of adequate physical accommodations for the judicial system;

To procure, distribute, exchange, transfer and assign such equipment, books, forms and supplies as are acquired with state funds or grant funds or otherwise for the judicial system;

To make recommendations for the improvement of the operations of the judicial system;

To prepare and submit an annual report on the work of the judicial system to the Supreme Court;

To take necessary steps in the collection of unpaid court costs, fines and forfeitures;

To perform such additional administrative duties relating to the improvement of the administration of justice as may be assigned by the Supreme Court; and

To promulgate standards, rules and regulations for computer and/or electronic filing and storage of all court records and court-related records maintained throughout the state in courts and in offices of circuit and chancery clerks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 5; Laws, 1995, ch. 547, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 440, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 507, § 6; Laws, 2015, ch. 418, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 9-21-11.
Director authorized to apply for, receive, and distribute, funds and grants.

The Administrative Director of Courts is authorized and empowered to: study and apply for any and all applications for funds and grants directed to the office from any federal governmental agency or entity; disburse such aid, assistance, funds, monies, grants or subgrants; and coordinate the same with the overall administration of justice in Mississippi to assist or aid in the administration of justice, criminal or civil, or the improvement of courts and the judicial system.

The courts of the state, regardless of the name they bear, shall be proper local units or entities of government to apply for and receive such assistance, aid, funds, monies, grants and subgrants.

Grants to youth courts shall be made in accordance with Section 43-21-801.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 6; Laws, 2015, ch. 418, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 9-21-13.
Director to coordinate functions and duties of administrative personnel; expenditure of state monies.

The Administrative Director of Courts shall coordinate the functions and duties of administrative personnel, including court administrators and court administrative aides to judges, to facilitate cooperation and so that the overall administration of justice may be accomplished with efficiency in all courts of the state.

The Administrative Director of Courts is authorized to direct the expenditure of state monies appropriated to the Administrative Office of Courts or any courts of the state for any and all functions or projects directly or indirectly affecting the operation of any court and may transfer monies appropriated for the office or any account to any one or more other accounts or office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1993).

§ 9-21-14.
Comprehensive Electronic Court Systems Fund created; purpose; distribution of monies from fund; continuing fund; pilot program.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Comprehensive Electronic Court Systems Fund. The purpose of the fund shall be to provide funding for the development, implementation and maintenance of a comprehensive case management and electronic filing system, one of the purposes of which will be to provide duplicate dockets and case files at remote sites. The system will be designed to:

Provide a framework for the seamless, transparent exchange of data among courts and with appropriate law enforcement, children’s services and public welfare agencies.

Allow judges and prosecutors to determine whether there are holds or warrants from other jurisdictions for defendants prior to release on bail or otherwise.

Assist related agencies in tracking the court activity of individuals in all participating jurisdictions.

Assist child protection and human services agencies to determine the status of children and caregivers in the participating jurisdictions.

Duplicate and preserve court documents at remote sites so that they may be protected against catastrophic loss.

Improve the ability of the Administrative Office of Courts and the state courts to handle efficiently monies flowing through the courts and to collect delinquent fees, fines and costs.

Enable the state courts and clerks to generate management reports and analysis tools, allowing them to constantly track individual cases and the overall caseload.

Provide a uniform system for docketing and tracking cases and to automatically generate status reports.

Enable the Administrative Office of Courts to acquire statistical data promptly and efficiently.

Make trial court and individual case dockets available to the public online through use of the Internet.

Monies from the fund shall be distributed by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Administrative Office of Courts.

The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal-year limitations, and shall consist of:

Monies appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of funding the comprehensive case management and electronic filing system;

The interest accruing to the fund;

Monies received from the federal government;

Donations; and

Monies received from such other sources as may be provided by law.

The Supreme Court may utilize and fund as a pilot program any case management and electronic filing system of the Three Rivers Planning and Development District or that of any county or vendor that complies with the data and case management and electronic filing policy standards adopted by the Supreme Court. No statewide comprehensive case management and electronic system shall be implemented by the Mississippi Supreme Court unless such system is approved by the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 573, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 385, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 9-21-15.
Director authorized to employ consultants and consultant firms.

The Administrative Director of Courts is authorized and empowered to employ consultants and consultant firms and to contract with the same for their services for reasonable compensation and as necessary to improve the administration of justice and the courts of the state. The contracts with such consultants or consultant firms shall be considered as contracts for professional services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1993).

§ 9-21-17.
Director, and Supreme Court, authorized to use services of any member of court and court-supportive personnel.

The Administrative Director of Courts and the Supreme Court are authorized to use the services of any member of the judiciary of any court and any court-supportive personnel, including, without limitation, court reporters, clerks, bailiffs, law clerks, court administrators, secretaries and employees in clerks’ offices to carry out studies, projects and functions designed to improve or effect the efficient administration of justice and the operation of courts.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1993).

§ 9-21-19.
Judges, clerks and other employees of court to comply with Director’s requests for information.

All judges, clerks of court, and other officers or employees of the courts and of offices related to and serving the courts shall comply with all requests made by the Administrative Director for information and statistical data relative to the work of the courts and of such offices and relative to the expenditure of public monies for their maintenance and operation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1993).

§ 9-21-21 through 9-21-41.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 396, §§ 1 through 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 2018).

§9-21-21. [Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 11; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1996, ch. 315, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1998, ch. 503, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 427, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2001).]

§ 9-21-23.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 396, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 2018).

§9-21-23. [Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 12; reenacted, Laws, 1996, ch. 315, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 503, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 427, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2001).]

§ 9-21-25.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 396, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 2018).

§9-21-25. [Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 13; reenacted, Laws, 1996, ch. 315, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 503, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 427, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2001).]

§ 9-21-27.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 396, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 2018).

§9-21-27. [Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 14; reenacted, Laws, 1996, ch. 315, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 503, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 427, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2001).]

§ 9-21-29.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 396, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 2018).

§9-21-29. [Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 15; reenacted, Laws, 1996, ch. 315, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 503, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 427, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2001).]

§ 9-21-31.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 396, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 2018).

§9-21-31. [Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 16; reenacted, Laws, 1996, ch. 315, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 503, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 427, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2001).]

§ 9-21-33.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 396, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 2018).

§9-21-33. [Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 17; reenacted, Laws, 1996, ch. 315, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 503, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 427, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2001).]

§ 9-21-35.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 396, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 2018).

§9-21-35. [Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 18; reenacted, Laws, 1996, ch. 315, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 503, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 427, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2001).]

§ 9-21-37.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 396, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 2018).

§9-21-37. [Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 19; reenacted, Laws, 1996, ch. 315, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 503, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 427, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2001).]

§ 9-21-39.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 396, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 2018).

§9-21-39. [Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 20; reenacted, Laws, 1996, ch. 315, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 503, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 427, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2001).]

§ 9-21-41.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 396, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 2018).

§9-21-41. [Laws, 1993, ch. 610, § 21; reenacted, Laws, 1996, ch. 315, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 503, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 427, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2001).]

§ 9-21-43.
Mississippi Civil Legal Assistance Fund created; organizations eligible to receive funds.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund designated as the Civil Legal Assistance Fund. The funds shall be administered by the Supreme Court through the Administrative Office of Courts. The Administrative Office of Courts may also accept monies from any public or private source for deposit into the fund. Money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned from the investment of monies in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the funds.

All monies shall be allocated to only those organizations providing legal services to low income Mississippians. Furthermore, no monies from this fund shall be expended to provide legal services in matters currently prohibited by the Legal Services Corporation, Washington, D.C., and no funds shall be expended on persons who are not financially eligible to receive legal services as directed by the Legal Services Corporation, Washington, D.C.

The monies appropriated shall be distributed to eligible legal services programs based on the percentage of poverty population within the program service area, consistent with the formula used by the Legal Services Corporation.

Monies appropriated to the fund may be used to promote increased participation by the private bar in the delivery of legal services to the indigent through the Mississippi Volunteer Lawyers Project.

Recipients of funds shall have the following duties:

To develop, operate and administer programs within their respective service areas that provide free legal services to indigent clients involved in civil matters;

To report annually to the Supreme Court, through the Administrative Office of Courts, on its activities, including providing a copy of its annual audit that accounts for the use of the funds; and

To refund annually all unused or uncommitted funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 474, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 9-21-45.
Judicial System Operation Fund created; source of money; use of funds.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund designated as the Judicial System Operation Fund. The funds shall be administered by the Supreme Court through the Administrative Office of Courts. The fund shall consist of monies deposited therein as provided in Section 99-19-72 and monies from any other source designated for deposit into the fund. The Administrative Office of Courts may also accept monies from any public or private source for deposit into the fund. Money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned from the investment of monies in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.

Monies in the fund shall be subject to appropriation by the Legislature and may only be used for the purpose of the operation of the judicial system in the state as determined necessary by the Supreme Court and to provide additional funds for the judicial salaries set forth in Section 25-3-35 and Section 9-9-11(8). Monies in the fund used for the purposes described in this section shall be in addition to other funds available from any other source for such purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 561, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 329, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.